Maine, session 132, LD1001.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4004-B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 342, §2, is further amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
If an infant is identified as affected by substance use or withdrawal symptoms from
prenatal drug exposure resulting only from the parent's receiving medication-assisted
treatment, as defined in section 4011-B, subsection 2, paragraph B, and there is no evidence
that the infant is abused or neglected or at risk of being abused or neglected, the
requirements of this section do not apply.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4011-A, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Medication-assisted treatment. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, a person who is otherwise required under this section to report to the department
any suspicion or knowledge of abuse or neglect may not report that a custodial parent,
parent, foster parent or other person responsible for the child is receiving medication-
assisted treatment as defined in section 4011-B, subsection 2, paragraph B if there is no
suspicion that a child has been or is at risk of being abused or neglected.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §4011-B, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2019, c. 342, §3, is further
amended to read:
1. Notification of prenatal exposure to drugs or having a fetal alcohol spectrum
disorder. A health care provider involved in the delivery or care of an infant who the
provider knows or has reasonable cause to suspect has been born affected by substance use,
has withdrawal symptoms that require medical monitoring or care beyond standard
newborn care when those symptoms have resulted from or have likely resulted from
prenatal drug exposure, whether the prenatal exposure was to legal or illegal drugs, or has
a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder shall notify the department of that condition in the infant
unless the infant is born to a parent who is receiving medication-assisted treatment and
there is no evidence of abuse or neglect. If a health care provider notifies the department
that an infant is born to a parent who is receiving medication-assisted treatment when there
is no evidence of abuse or neglect, the department may not take any further action based
on the notification. The notification required by this subsection must be made in the same
manner as reports of abuse or neglect required by this subchapter.
A. This section, and any notification made pursuant to this section, may not be
construed to establish a definition of "abuse" or "neglect."
B. This section, and any notification made pursuant to this section, may not be
construed to require prosecution for any illegal action, including, but not limited to, the
act of exposing a fetus to drugs or other substances.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §4011-B, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. Z, §5, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
2. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context indicates otherwise, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Health care provider" means a person described in section 4011‑A, subsection 1,
paragraph A, subparagraphs (1) to (10), (15), (17) to (20) or (22) or any person who
Page 1 - 132LR0388(01)

412 assists in the delivery or birth of a child for compensation, including, but not limited
423 to, a midwife or provides services to a newborn child.
B. "Medication-assisted treatment" means a treatment method that consists of, or
includes, medication approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the
treatment of substance use disorder provided by a health care provider or at a
methadone treatment program.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §4011-B, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Develop plan for safe care. For an infant who a health care provider knows or has
reasonable cause to suspect has been born affected by substance use or has withdrawal
symptoms that require medical monitoring or care beyond standard newborn care due to
the parent's receiving medication-assisted treatment, but when there is no evidence of abuse
or neglect, the health care provider shall develop a plan for the safe care of the infant and,
in appropriate cases, refer the infant or parent or both to a social service agency or another
health care provider for any required services.